Montana, session 2025, HB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 10-1-104, MCA, is amended to read:
"10-1-104. Federal regulations to govern. (1) Federal laws and regulations, forms, precedents, and
usages relating to and governing the armed forces of the United States and the national guard, as in effect on
October 1, 2023 2025, insofar as they are applicable and not inconsistent with the constitution and laws of this
state or with a rule or regulation adopted pursuant to 10-1-105, apply to and govern the national guard of this
state, including all members on active duty within the state as active duty guard/reserve (AGR) personnel under
Title 32 of the United States Code.
(2) The Uniform Code of Military Justice, as in effect on October 1, 2023 2025, including the
regulations, manuals, forms, precedents, and usages implementing, interpreting, and complementing the code,
is adopted for use by the national guard of this state and applies, insofar as the code is not otherwise
inconsistent with the constitution and laws of this state, including the regulations, manuals, forms, precedents,
and usages implementing, interpreting, and complementing the constitution and laws of this state, or with a rule
or regulation adopted pursuant to 10-1-105, to the greatest extent practicable to govern the national guard of
this state, including all members on active duty within the state as active duty guard/reserve (AGR) personnel
under Title 32 of the United States Code when the members are serving other than in a federal capacity under
Title 10 of the United States Code."
Applicability. [This act] applies to events that occur and proceedings begun on or after October 1,
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 66
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 66
2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 66
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 66, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 66
INTRODUCED BY P. ELVERUM
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
AN ACT ADOPTING THE MOST RECENT FEDERAL MILITARY LAWS, REGULATIONS, AND CODES
APPLICABLE TO THE GOVERNANCE OF THE MONTANA NATIONAL GUARD; AMENDING SECTION 10-1-
104, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”